Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1732
Exchange agent; file information.

An exchange agent, including the developer who is also the exchange agent, shall file a statement with the commission containing a list of time-share programs for which it is offering exchange services, its principal office address and telephone number, a designation of its responsible managing employee or person with whom any contact is to be made, and the information required in subdivisions (1) through (7) of section 76-1714. Such statement may omit any information which the exchange agent certifies in writing to the developer and which the developer includes in the public-offering statement.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 32;

Laws 2001, LB 68, § 15.